pt-BR: Nível de educação: Universidade; Escola primária; Pós-graduação; Ensino médio; Ensino fundamental; Profissional; Outro
sl-SI: Izobraževalna stopnja: Visoka šola; Osnovna šola; Podiplomska šola; Srednja šola; Druga polovica osnovne šole; Profesionalno; Drugo
hr-HR: Stupanj obrazovanja: Koledž; Osnovna škola; Diplomski studij; Srednja škola; Viša osnovna škola; Profesionalac; Ostalo
nb: Utdanningsnivå: Høyskole; Barneskole; Universitet; Videregående; Ungdomsskole; Yrkesskole; Annet
tr: Eğitim Seviyesi: Üniversite; İlkokul; Yüksek lisans; Lise; Orta okul; Profesyonel; Diğer
pl: Poziom wykształcenia: Szkoła wyższa; Szkoła podstawowa; Studia podyplomowe; Szkoła średnia; Gimnazjum; Specjalista; Inne
fi: Koulutustaso: College; Peruskoulu; Ylempi korkeakoulututkinto; Lukio; Yläaste; Ammattilaiskoulutus; Muu
de: Bildungsniveau: Hochschule; Grundschule; Graduate School; High School; Middle School; Professionell; Sonstiges
zh-TW: 教育等級: 大學; 小學; 研究所; 高中; 初中; 職業; 其他
pt-PT: Nível de ensino: Faculdade; Escola Primária; Pós-graduação; Escola Secundária; Escola Básica; Profissionais; Outro
en: Education level: College; Elementary school; Graduate school; High school; Middle school; Professional; Other
nl: Opleidingsniveau: Middelbare school; Lagere school; Afstuderen; Middelbare school; Middenschool; Vakonderwijs; Andere
it: Livello scolastico: Università; Scuola elementare; Scuola di specializzazione; Scuola superiore; Scuole medie; Professionale; Altro
sv: Utbildningsnivå: Högskola; Grundskola; Forskarskola; Gymnasium; Grundskola; Professionella; Övrigt
es: Nivel de educación: Universidad; Escuela primaria; Escuela de posgrado; Escuela secundaria; Escuela intermedia; Profesional; Otros
th: ระดับการศึกษา: วิทยาลัย; ประถมศึกษา; บัณฑิตวิทยาลัย; มัธยมศึกษาตอนปลาย; มัธยมศึกษาตอนต้น; วิชาชีพ; อื่นๆ
ru: Уровень образования: Колледж; Начальная школа; Высшая школа; Старшая школа; Средняя школа; Профессиональный; Другой
cs: Stupeň vzdělání: Vysoká škola; Základní škola; Postgraduální vzdělávání; Střední škola; Nižší sekundární škola; Profesionál; Jiné
lt-LT: Švietimo lygis: Koledžas; Pradinė mokykla; Magistro studijos; Vidurinė mokykla; Pagrindinė mokykla; Profesinio rengimo centras; Kita
da: Uddannelsesniveau: College; Folkeskole; Kort videregående uddannelse; Gymnasium; Mellemskole; Professional; Andet
ro-RO: Nivel studii: Colegiu; Școală primară; Universitate; Liceu; Gimnaziu; Profesional; Altele
bg-BG: Образователно ниво: Колеж; Начално училище; Висше училище; Гимназия; Средно училище; Професионално; Други
el: Επίπεδο εκπαίδευσης: Πανεπιστήμιο; Δημοτικό σχολείο; Μεταπτυχιακό; Λύκειο; Γυμνάσιο; Επαγγελματική; Άλλο
fr: Niveau de formation: Université; École primaire; Études de troisième cycle; Lycée; Collège; Professionnel; Autre
zh-CN: 教育程度: 大学; 小学; 研究生院; 高中; 初中; 专业学校; 其他
hu: Oktatási szint: Egyetem/főiskola; Általános iskola; Posztgraduális képzés; Gimnázium; Középiskola; Szakképzési szint; Egyéb
vi: Trình độ học vấn: Cao đẳng; Tiểu học; Cao học; Trung học phổ thông; Trung học cơ sở; Chuyên nghiệp; Khác
ko: 교육 수준: 대학교; 초등학교; 대학원; 고등학교; 중학교; 전문가; 기타
sk-SK: Úroveň vzdelania: Vysoká škola; Základná škola; Vyššia odborná škola; Stredná škola; Druhý stupeň základnej školy; Odborný; Iné
ja: 教育レベル: 大学; 小学校; 大学院; 高校; 中学校; プロ; その他